North Carolina, session 2025, HB22.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 79 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 79.
"Investigation of Fires and Inspection of Premises.
"§ 58-79-1. Fires investigated; reports; records.investigated.
The Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, through the State Bureau of Investigation,
the Office of the State Fire Marshal, and the chief of the fire department, or chief of police where
there is no chief of the fire department, in municipalities and towns, and the county fire marshal
and the sheriff of the county and the chief of the rural fire department where such fire occurs
outside of a municipality, are hereby authorized to investigate the cause, origin, and
circumstances of every fire occurring in such municipalities or counties in which property has
been destroyed or damaged, and shall specially make investigation whether the fire was the result
of carelessness or design. A preliminary investigation shall be made by the chief of fire
department or chief of police, where there is no chief of fire department in municipalities, and by
the county fire marshal and the sheriff of the county or the chief of the rural fire department
where such fire occurs outside of a municipality, and must be begun within three days, exclusive
of Sunday, of the occurrence of the fire, and both the Director of the State Bureau of
Investigation, through the State Bureau of Investigation, and the State Fire Marshal, through the
Office of the State Fire Marshal, shall have the right to supervise and direct the investigation
when he deems it expedient or necessary.as determined by the official who conducts the
preliminary investigation. If the official who conducts the preliminary investigation requests
investigative assistance from a State agency, the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation,
through the State Bureau of Investigation, shall have the exclusive right to supervise and direct
investigations in cases involving death or serious bodily injury, first- or second-degree arson,
buildings owned or occupied by State or local government, and buildings owned or leased by
educational institutions, churches, or religious buildings.
The officer making the investigation of fires shall forthwith notify the Director of the State
Bureau of Investigation, and must within one week of the occurrence of the fire furnish to the
Director of the State Bureau of Investigation a written statement of all facts relating to the cause
and origin of the fire, the kind, value and ownership of the property destroyed, and such other
information as is called for by the forms provided by the Director of the State Bureau of
Investigation. Departments capable of submitting the required information by the utilization of
computers and related equipment, by means of an approved format of standard punch cards,
*H22-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
magnetic tapes or an approved telecommunications system, may do so in lieu of the submission
of the written statement as provided for in this section. The Director of the State Bureau of
Investigation shall keep in his office a record of all reports submitted pursuant to this section.
These reports shall at all times be open to public inspection.
"§ 58-79-5. Director of the State Bureau of Investigation and the State Fire Marshal to
make examination; arrests and prosecution.
It is the duty of the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation and the State Fire Marshal
to examine, or cause examination to be made, into the cause, circumstances, and origin of all
fires occurring within the State to which his their attention has been called in accordance with
the provisions of G.S. 58-79-1, or by interested parties, by which property is accidentally or
unlawfully burned, destroyed, or damaged, whenever in his their judgment the evidence is
sufficient, and to specially examine and decide whether the fire was the result of carelessness or
the act of an incendiary. The Director of the State Bureau of Investigation and the State Fire
Marshal shall, in person, by deputy or otherwise, fully investigate all circumstances surrounding
such fire, and, when in his their opinion such proceedings are necessary, take or cause to be taken
the testimony on oath of all persons supposed to be cognizant of any facts or to have means of
knowledge in relation to the matters as to which an examination is herein required to be made,
and shall cause the same to be reduced in writing. If the Director of the State Bureau of
Investigation Investigation, the State Fire Marshal, or any deputy appointed to conduct such
investigations, is investigations is of the opinion that there is evidence to charge any person or
persons with the crime of arson, or other willful burning, or fraud in connection with the crime
of arson or other willful burning, he the Director may arrest with warrant or cause such person
or persons to be arrested, charged with such offense, and prosecuted, and shall furnish to the
district attorney of the district all such evidence, together with the names of witnesses and all
other information obtained by him, obtained, including a copy of all pertinent and material
testimony taken in the case.
"§ 58-79-10. Powers of the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation and the State Fire
Marshal in investigations.
The Director of the State Bureau of Investigation, the State Fire Marshal, or his deputy their
deputies appointed to conduct such examination, has have the powers of a trial justice for the
purpose of summoning and compelling the attendance of witnesses to testify in relation to any
matter which is by provisions of this Article a subject of inquiry and investigation, and may
administer oaths and affirmations to persons appearing as witnesses before them. False swearing
in any such matter or proceeding is perjury and shall be punished as such. The Director of the
State Bureau of Investigation Investigation, the State Fire Marshal, or his deputy has their
deputies have authority at all times of the day or night, in performance of the duties imposed by
the provisions of this Article, to enter upon and examine any building or premises where any fire
has occurred, and other buildings and premises adjoining or near the same. All investigations
held by or under the direction of the Director of the State Bureau of Investigation Investigation,
the State Fire Marshal, or his deputy their deputies may, in their discretion, be private, and
persons other than those required to be present by the provisions of this Article may be excluded
from the place where the investigation is held, and witnesses may be kept apart from each other
and not allowed to communicate with each other until they have been examined.
"§ 58-79-15. Failure to comply with summons or subpoena.
The failure of a person to comply with a summons or subpoena of the Director of the State
Bureau of Investigation Investigation, the State Fire Marshal, or his deputy their deputies under
G.S. 58-79-10 shall be brought before a court of record and punished as for contempt in the same
manner as if he the person had failed to appear and testify before said court of record.
…
"§ 58-79-40. Insurance company to furnish information.
Page 2 House Bill 22-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The chief of any municipal fire or police department, county fire marshal or sheriff,
or special agent of the State Bureau of Investigation or the Office of the State Fire Marshal may
request any insurance company investigating a fire loss of real or personal property to release
any information in its possession relative to that loss. The company shall release the information
and cooperate with any official authorized to request such information pursuant to this section.
The information shall include, but is not limited to:
(1) Any insurance policy relevant to a fire loss under investigation and any
application for such a policy;
(2) Policy premium payment records;
(3) History of previous claims made by the insured for fire loss;
(4) Material relating to the investigation of the loss, including statements of any
person, proof of loss, and any other relevant evidence.
(b) If an insurance company (or insurance agency) has reason to suspect that a fire loss
to its insured's real or personal property was caused by incendiary means, the company shall
furnish the State Bureau of Investigation or the Office of the State Fire Marshal with all relevant
material acquired during its investigation of the fire loss, cooperate with and take such action as
may be requested of it by any law-enforcement agency, and permit any person ordered by a court
to inspect any of its records pertaining to the policy and the loss.
(c) In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurance company (or insurance agency), or
person who furnishes information on its behalf, shall be liable for damages in a civil action or
subject to criminal prosecution for any oral or written statement made or any other action that is
necessary to supply information required pursuant to this section.
(d) The officials and departmental and agency personnel receiving any information
furnished pursuant to this section shall hold the information in confidence until such time as its
release is required pursuant to a criminal or civil proceeding.
(e) Any official referred to in subsection (a) of this section may be required to testify as
to any information in his the official's possession regarding the fire loss of real or personal
property in any civil action in which any person seeks recovery under a policy against an
insurance company for the fire loss.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
House Bill 22-Second Edition Page 3